src/morphology/inflection/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRESENT][PRS=SG1]:n V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRESENT][PRS=SG2]:t V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRESENT][PRS=PL1]:mme   V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRESENT][PRS=PL2]:tte   V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRESENT][NEG=CON]:0    V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=IMPV][PRS=SG2]:0    V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRESENT][PRS=SG1]:n V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRESENT][PRS=SG2]:t V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRESENT][PRS=PL1]:mme   V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRESENT][PRS=PL2]:tte   V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRESENT][NEG=CON]:0    V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=IMPV][PRS=SG2]:0    V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRESENT][PRS=PL3]:vat   V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][INF=MA][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:matta   V_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
[VOICE=ACT][INF=MA][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:malla   V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][INF=MA][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:masta   V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][INF=MA][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:maan    V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][INF=MA][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:massa   V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][INF=MA][NUM=SG][CASE=INS]:man    V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][DRV=MAISILLA]:maisilla   V_BACK_POSS_AN_OBL        ;

LEXICON V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRESENT][PRS=PL3]:vät   V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][INF=MA][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:mättä   V_FRONT_POSS_AN_OPT      ;
[VOICE=ACT][INF=MA][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:mällä   V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][INF=MA][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:mästä   V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][INF=MA][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:mään    V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][INF=MA][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:mässä   V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][INF=MA][NUM=SG][CASE=INS]:män    V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][DRV=MAISILLA]:mäisillä   V_FRONT_POSS_AN_OBL        ;

LEXICON V_BACK_3SG_A
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRESENT][PRS=SG3]:a V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON V_BACK_3SG_E
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRESENT][PRS=SG3]:e V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON V_FRONT_3SG_E
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRESENT][PRS=SG3]:e V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON V_BACK_3SG_I
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRESENT][PRS=SG3]:i V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON V_FRONT_3SG_I
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRESENT][PRS=SG3]:i V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON V_BACK_3SG_O
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRESENT][PRS=SG3]:o V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON V_BACK_3SG_U
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRESENT][PRS=SG3]:u V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON V_FRONT_3SG_Y
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRESENT][PRS=SG3]:y V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON V_FRONT_3SG_Ö
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRESENT][PRS=SG3]:ö V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON V_FRONT_3SG_Ä
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRESENT][PRS=SG3]:ä V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON V_BACK_WEAK_PAST
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PAST][PRS=SG1]:in   V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PAST][PRS=SG2]:it   V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PAST][PRS=PL1]:imme V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PAST][PRS=PL2]:itte V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PAST][PRS=SG1]:in   V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PAST][PRS=SG2]:it   V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PAST][PRS=PL1]:imme V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PAST][PRS=PL2]:itte V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON V_BACK_STRONG_PAST
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PAST][PRS=SG3]:i    V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PAST][PRS=PL3]:ivat  V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PAST][PRS=PL3]:ivät  V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PAST][PRS=SG3]:i    V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON V_BACK_IMPERATIVE
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=IMPV][PRS=PL1]:kaamme   V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=IMPV][PRS=PL2][CLIT=S]:kaas  V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=IMPV][PRS=PL2]:kaa  V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=IMPV][PRS=PL3]:koot V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=IMPV][PRS=SG3]:koon V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[MOOD=IMPV][NEG=CON]:ko   V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=IMPV][PRS=PL1]:käämme   V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=IMPV][PRS=PL2][CLIT=S]:kääs  V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=IMPV][PRS=PL2]:kää  V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=IMPV][PRS=PL3]:kööt V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=IMPV][PRS=SG3]:köön V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[MOOD=IMPV][NEG=CON]:kö   V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON V_BACK_CONDITIONAL
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=COND][PRS=PL1]:isimme V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=COND][PRS=PL2]:isitte V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=COND][PRS=PL3]:isivat  V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=COND][PRS=SG1]:isin   V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=COND][PRS=SG2]:isit   V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=COND][PRS=SG3]:isi    V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=COND][NEG=CON]:isi V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=COND][PRS=PL1]:isimme V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=COND][PRS=PL2]:isitte V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=COND][PRS=PL3]:isivät  V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=COND][PRS=SG1]:isin   V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=COND][PRS=SG2]:isit   V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=COND][PRS=SG3]:isi    V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=COND][NEG=CON]:isi V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=PL1]:nemme V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=PL2]:nette V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=PL3]:nevat  V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=SG1]:nen   V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=SG2]:net   V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=SG3]:nee   V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][NEG=CON]:ne V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][DRV=NUT][PCP=NUT]:n   A_KULUNUT       ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PAST][NEG=CON]:nut  V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=PL1]:nemme V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=PL2]:nette V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=PL3]:nevät  V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=SG1]:nen   V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=SG2]:net   V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=SG3]:nee   V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][NEG=CON]:ne V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][DRV=NUT][PCP=NUT]:n   A_ÄLLISTYNYT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PAST][NEG=CON]:nyt  V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON V_BACK_POTENTIAL_S
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=PL1]:semme V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=PL2]:sette V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=PL3]:sevat  V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=SG1]:sen   V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=SG2]:set   V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=SG3]:see   V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][NEG=CON]:se V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][DRV=NUT][PCP=NUT]:s   A_KULUNUT       ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PAST][NEG=CON]:sut  V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_S
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=PL1]:semme V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=PL2]:sette V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=PL3]:sevät  V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=SG1]:sen   V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=SG2]:set   V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=SG3]:see   V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][NEG=CON]:se V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][DRV=NUT][PCP=NUT]:s A_ÄLLISTYNYT      ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PAST][NEG=CON]:syt  V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON V_BACK_POTENTIAL_L
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=PL1]:lemme V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=PL2]:lette V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=PL3]:levat  V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=SG1]:len   V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=SG2]:let   V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=SG3]:lee   V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][NEG=CON]:le V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][DRV=NUT][PCP=NUT]:l  A_KULUNUT      ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PAST][NEG=CON]:lut  V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_L
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=PL1]:lemme V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=PL2]:lette V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=PL3]:levät  V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=SG1]:len   V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=SG2]:let   V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=SG3]:lee   V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][NEG=CON]:le V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][DRV=NUT][PCP=NUT]:l  A_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PAST][NEG=CON]:lyt  V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON V_BACK_POTENTIAL_R
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=PL1]:remme V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=PL2]:rette V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=PL3]:revat  V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=SG1]:ren   V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=SG2]:ret   V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=SG3]:ree   V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][NEG=CON]:re V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][DRV=NUT][PCP=NUT]:r  A_KULUNUT      ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PAST][NEG=CON]:rut  V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_R
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=PL1]:remme V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=PL2]:rette V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=PL3]:revät  V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=SG1]:ren   V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=SG2]:ret   V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][PRS=SG3]:ree   V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=POTN][NEG=CON]:re V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=ACT][DRV=NUT][PCP=NUT]:r  A_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
[VOICE=ACT][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PAST][NEG=CON]:ryt  V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;

LEXICON V_BACK_PASSIVE
[VOICE=PSS][MOOD=COND][PRS=PE4]:taisiin V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=PSS][MOOD=COND][PRS=PE4][NEG=CON]:taisi  V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=PSS][MOOD=IMPV][PRS=PE4][NEG=CON]:tako    V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=PSS][MOOD=IMPV][PRS=PE4]:takoon    V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=PSS][INF=E][CASE=INE]:taessa  V_BACK_CLIT_OPT      ;
[VOICE=PSS][INF=E][CASE=INS]:taen   V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=PSS][INF=MA][NUM=SG][CASE=INS]:taman  V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=PSS][MOOD=POTN][PRS=PE4]:taneen  V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=PSS][MOOD=POTN][PRS=PE4][NEG=CON]:tane   V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=PSS][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PAST][PRS=PE4]:tiin V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=PSS][DRV=VA][PCP=VA]:tav    N_SOITTAJA   ;

LEXICON V_FRONT_PASSIVE
[VOICE=PSS][MOOD=COND][PRS=PE4]:täisiin V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=PSS][MOOD=COND][PRS=PE4][NEG=CON]:täisi  V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=PSS][MOOD=IMPV][PRS=PE4][NEG=CON]:täkö    V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=PSS][MOOD=IMPV][PRS=PE4]:täköön    V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=PSS][INF=E][CASE=INE]:täessä  V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT      ;
[VOICE=PSS][INF=E][CASE=INS]:täen   V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=PSS][INF=MA][CASE=INS]:tämän  V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=PSS][MOOD=POTN][PRS=PE4]:täneen  V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=PSS][MOOD=POTN][PRS=PE4][NEG=CON]:täne   V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=PSS][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PAST][PRS=PE4]:tiin V_FRONT_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=PSS][DRV=VA][PCP=VA]:täv    A_TYÖLLISTETTÄVÄ ;

LEXICON V_BACK_PASSIVE_T
[VOICE=PSS][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRESENT][PRS=PE4]:taan    V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
[VOICE=PSS][MOOD=INDV][TENSE=PRESENT][PRS=PE4][NEG=CON]:ta    V_BACK_CLIT_OPT     ;
